Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB619.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1425(d) and (h) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1425. Sudden Cardiac Arrest and Electrocardiogram Testing.--* * *(d) (1) Once each school year, a coach of an athletic activity shall complete the sudden cardiac arrest training course offered by a provider approved by the department.(1.1) In accordance with clause (3), a coach of an athletic activity shall be certified in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and 1234567891011121314151617181920 the use of an automated external defibrillator.(2) A coach of an athletic activity shall not coach the athletic activity until the coach completes the training [course] courses required under this subsection.(3) A coach shall a ttain and renew certifications for cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of an automated external defibrillator every two (2) years through the American Heart Association, the American Red Cross or an equivalent course of instruction approved by the department. The school entity shall keep a record of each certified coach under clause (1.1) with the date certified, and renewed, if applicable, and make the information available to the public at the school entity.(d.1) Once each school year, an employee of the school entity who supervises a school-sponsored activity regardless of whether the school-sponsored activity is during or after school, shall:(1) Complete the sudden cardiac arrest training course offered by the American Heart Association, the American Red Cross or through an equivalent course of instruction approved by the department.(2) Not supervise any school-sponsored activity until the employee becomes certified in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of an automated external defibrillator.(3) Attain and renew certifications every two (2) years through the American Heart Association, the American Red Cross or an equivalent course of instruction approved by the department.* * *(h) As used in this section--20250SB0619PN0630 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Athletic activity" means all of the following:(1) Interscholastic athletics.(2) An athletic contest or competition, other than interscholastic athletics, that is sponsored by or associated with a school entity, including cheerleading, club-sponsored sports activities and sports activities sponsored by school-affiliated organizations.(3) Noncompetitive cheerleading that is sponsored by or associated with a school entity.(4) Practices, interschool practices and scrimmages for all of the activities listed under clauses (1), (2) and (3)."Automated external defibrillator" means the same as "automatic external defibrillator" as defined in section 1423(l)."Department" means the Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Interscholastic athletics" means as defined in section 1602-A."School entity" means as defined in section 1602-A."School-sponsored activity" means assemblies, graduation ceremonies, athletics, extracurricular activities, clubs, groups, teams or any activity sponsored, held or approved by the school entity whether held during or outside of normal school hours.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0619PN0630 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425